Hawaii statutes.
[§466-40] Procedures for sponsoring
organization. (a) To qualify as a sponsoring organization, a third-party
entity shall submit a peer review administration plan to the board for review
and approval. The peer review administration plan shall:

(1) Establish a peer review report committee and any
necessary subcommittees and provide professional staff as needed for the
operation of the peer review program;

(2) Establish a program to communicate to firms
participating in the peer review program the latest developments in peer review
standards and the most common findings in the peer reviews conducted by the
sponsoring organization;

(3) Establish procedures for resolving any
disagreement that may arise out of the performance of a peer review;

(4) Establish procedures to resolve matters that may
lead to the dismissal of a firm from the peer review program;

(5) Establish procedures to evaluate and document the
performance of each peer reviewer, including procedures related to the
disqualification of a reviewer who does not meet the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants standards;

(6) Require the maintenance of records of peer
reviews conducted under the program in accordance with the records retention
rules of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and this part;
and

(7) Provide for periodic reports to the board on the
results of the peer review program; provided that reports submitted to the
board shall not contain information concerning specific firms or peer
reviewers.

(b) A sponsoring organization:

(1) Shall be subject to review and oversight by the
board;

(2) Shall not require firms or the firms' owners or
employees to become members of the sponsoring organization to participate in a
peer review; and

(3) Shall charge the same rate for peer review
services to members and nonmembers.

(c) The public company accounting oversight
board shall be exempt from the requirements of this section. [L 2012, c 324, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next